apertium-tyv.tyv.twol
"Harmony of extra {и} in some stems"
%{и%}:Vy <=> [ :Vx :Cns* :Cns ]/:0* _ %>:/:0* ;
         except 
             с к _ (%{☭%}:) %>: ;   ! always :и
             _ .#. ;                ! always :0
             с: _ %>:0 \%{z%}: ;    ! always :0
             !с: _ %>:0 [ ? - %{z%}: ] ;    ! always :0
             !с: _ %>:0 [ %{N%}: | %{L%}: | %{D%}: | %{G%}: ] ;    ! always :0
         where Vx in ( ү и е э ө а о ы у я ё ю )
               Vy in ( ү и и и ү ы у ы у ы у у )
         matched ;

!@ ф о н д {и}:у {☭}:0 >:0 {z}:з {I}:у {n}:0

"Always realise {и} as и after ск"
%{и%}:и <=> с к _ (%{☭%}:) %>: ; 

!@ к о м п л е к с:0 {и}:и >:0 {z}:з {I}:и {n}:0

!@ Б е л о ц а р с к {и}:и >:0 {D}:д {A}:е н

!@ п р е з и д е н т {и}:и >:0 {z}:з {I}:и {n}:0


"Turn {E} into й after a vowel"
%{E%}:й <=> [ :Vow ]/[ %>: | :0 - й: ] _ ;

!@ т а й:0 >:0 {E}:я


!!== Vowel-harmony-related deletion ==!!

"{i} deletion after vowel"
%{i%}:0 <=> :Vow/[ :0 - [ Velars: | %{л%}: | п: ] ]* _ ;
        except
            ![ Vow: [ Velars:0 | %{л%}:0 ] ]/[ :0 - [ Velars: | %{л%}: ] ]* _ ;
            .#. :а %{л%}:0 %>: _ :п .#. ;
            ![ \.#. :Vow %{л%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{л%}: ]* _ ;
            !.#. [ :Vow - :а ] %{л%}:0 _ :п .#. ;
            !.#. :а %{л%}:0 %>: _ \:п ;

"{i} deletion after {л}:0 in алып only"
%{i%}:0 <=> .#. :а %{л%}:0 %>: _ :п .#. ;

"{I} deletion after long vowels and {B}{A}?"
%{I%}:0 <=> [ :Vow :RealVow ]/:0* _ ;
            .#. ч: о: %{р%}:0 %>: _ р: ;
            %{B%}: %{A%}: %>: _ ;
            ! %{р%}:0/:0 _ р: ;
        except
            [ :Vow Velars:0 ]/[ :0 - Velars: ]* _ ;
            [ :Vow %{л%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{л%}: ]* _ ;
            [ [ [ ?: :Vow ] - [ ч: о: ] ] %{р%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{р%}: ]* _ ;
            [ AbstractVow:0 :Cns* ]/[ :%- | :0 - AbstractVow: ]* _ ;
            [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns :л ь:0 ]/[ :0 - [ ь: | т: ] ]* _ ;
            [ :BackVow :Cns* ь: ]/[ :0 - [ ь: | т: ] ]* _ ;

!@ Т ы в а   А С С Р {э}:0 >:0 {N}:н {I}:и ң

!@ ч у г:0 >:0 %{I}:у р

!@ х ү н >:0 {z}:0 {I}:ү {n}:0



!!== Vowel harmony in context of other processes ==!!

"{I} harmony after deleted velar (or р or л)"
%{I%}:Vy <=> [ Vx: Velars:0 ]/[ :0 - Velars: ]* _ ;
             [ Vx: %{л%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{л%}: ]* _ ;
             [ Vx: %{р%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{р%}: ]* _ ;
         except
             [ AbstractVow:0 :Cns* ]/[ :%- | :0 - AbstractVow: ]* _ ;
             [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns :л ь:0 ]/:[ :0 - [ ь: | т: ] ]* _ ;
             [ :BackVow :Cns* ь: ]/[ :0 - ь: ]* _ ;
             .#. ч: о: %{р%}:0 %>: _ р: ;
         where Vx in ( и ү е э ө а о ы у я )
               Vy in ( и ү э э ө а о ы у а )
         matched ;

"{i} harmony after deleted velar"
%{i%}:Vy <=> [ Vx: Velars:0 ]/[ :0 - Velars: ]* _ ;
             [ Vx: %{л%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{л%}: ]* _ ;
             [ Vx: п:0 ]/[ :0 - п: ]* _ ;
         except
             .#. :а %{л%}:0 %>: _ :п .#. ; !@ а л:0 >:0 {i}:0 п
             :Vow/[ :0 - [ Velars: | %{л%}: | п: ] ]* _ ;
         where Vx in ( и ү э е ө а о ы у я )
               Vy in ( и ү э э ө а о ы у а )
         matched ;

"(verb)stem vowel-final assimliation before {g} deletion"
Vx:Vy <=> _ %>: %{g%}:0 %{A%}: ;
      where Vx in ( и ү е у ы ) ! а э  FIXME: are there other vowels a verb can dend with, besides those that don't change?
            Vy in ( э э э а а ) ! а э
      matched ;

!!FIXME: might be able to combine with above rule?
!! wait for rules to grow some
!"(verb)stem vowel-final assimliation before velar deletion"
!Vx:Vy <=> _ Velars:0 %>: [ %{I%}: | %{i%}: ]/:0* ;
!      where Vx in ( и е а у )
!            Vy in ( и э а у )
!      matched ;

"Fix е to э when it becomes first part of long vowel, e.g. in velar deletion"
е:э <=> _ %{i%}:э/:0 ;
        _ %{I%}:э/:0 ;
!        _ %{A%}:э/:0 ;

!@ н е г е:э >:0 {g}:0 {A}:э н

"Vowel harmony for {A} after and before deleted {g}"
%{A%}:э <=> [ :FrontVow %{g%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{g%}: ]* _ ;
            [ :FrontVow :Cns* :RealCns ]/:0* _ [ %{g%}:0 %{A%}: ]/[ :0 - %{g%}: ]* ;
!                                                   _ %>: %{g%}: ; 

!@ б и ж и:э >:0 {g}:0 {A}:э н

!@ к ө р >:0 {B}:б {A}:э >:0 {g}:0 {A}:э н 


!!== Morphological stuff ==!!

"{I} deletion in px3.acc"
%{I%}:0 <=> [ %{n%}: %{N%}: ]/[ :0 - [ %{n%}: | %{N%}: | AbstractVow: ] ]* _ .#. ;
            %{n%}: %>: %{N%}: _ .#. ;
        except
            [ AbstractVow:0 :Cns* ]/[ :%- | [ :0 - [ %{N%}: | %{n%}: | AbstractVow: ] ] ]* _ ;
            ! [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns л ь :Cns* :RealCns ]/:0* _ ;
            ! [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns л ь:0 ]/:[ :0 - ь: ]* _ ;

!@ р у б л ь:0 >:0 {z}:0 {I}:и {n}:0 >:0 {N}:н {I}:0

"{N} is н after {n} (and default)"
%{N%}:н <=> %{n%}:/[ :0 - %{n%}: ]* _ ;
            :Nasals/[ :0 - %{n%}: ]* _ ;
            [ :Vow | :HighSonCns ]/[ :ь | [ :0 - %{n%}: ] ]* _ ;
        except
            AbstractCns:/[ :0 - AbstractCns: ]* _ ;
            :VoicelessCnsRus %{☭%}: %>: _ ;

"Deletion of {n} word finally" ! {n} surfaces everywhere but nom, acc, gen
%{n%}:0 <=> _ :0* .#. ;
            _ %{N%}:н/[ :0 - AbstractCns: ]* ; 

!@ б ү р ү >:0 {z}:з {I}:ү {n}:0


!!== Misc segmental stuff ==!!

"/рк/ cluster to [рт]"
%{к%}:т <=> :р _ .#. ;
        :р _ %>: :Cns/:0* ;

"/к/ voicing intervocalically"
%{к%}:г <=> :р _ %>: :Vow/:0* ;

"{г} devoicing when syllable-final"
%{г%}:к <=> :Vow _ [ :VoicelessCns %>: :Vow ]/:0* ;

"{г} surfaces as г syllable finally before some(?) consonants"
%{г%}:г <=> :Vow _ [ [ :Liquid | :ж ] %>: :Vow ]/:0* ;

!@ о {г}:г л >:0 {i}:у м

!@ д ү {г}:г {y}:0 ж >:0 {I}:ү р

"{г} turns into preceding vowel when in closed syllable"
%{г%}:Vy <=> :Vx _ :Cns/:0* .#. ;
         :Vx _ [ :Cns %>: :Cns ]/:0* ;
     except
         !:Vow _ [ :VoicelessCns %>: :Vow ]/:0* ; ! needed to avoid conflicts, meh
         :Vow _ [ :Cns %>: :Vow ]/:0* ;
     where Vx in ( а о э ү ы )
           Vy in ( а о э ү ы )
     matched ;

"{н} surfaces as н when syllable-finally"
%{н%}:н <=> :Vow _ [ :Cns :Vow ]/:0* ;

!"{н} deletion when part of coda cluster"
!%{н%}:0 <=> :Vow _ [ :Cns :Cns ]/:0* ;
!            :Vow _ :Cns/:0* .#. ;

"ш to ч after certain things"
ш:ч <=> %{н%}:н _ ;                            ! -after {н} when it surfaces
        [ :т %{y%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{y%}: ]* _ ;    ! after т when no epenthesis
        [ л: %{y%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{y%}: ]* _ ;    ! after л when no epenthesis
        [ :н %{y%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{y%}: ]* _ ;    ! after н when no epenthesis

!@ т у л {y}:0 ш:ч >:0 {i}:у р

!@ ө г л е н {y}:0 ш:ч >:0 {i}:и п

"ъ deletion syllable finally before с:з"
ъ:0 <=> :Vow _ [ с: :Vow ]/:0* ;

!@ ч а ъ:0 с:з >:0 {z}:0 {I}:ы {n}:0
!@ э ъ т:д >:0 {z}:0 {I}:и {n}:0

"ь deletion at the end of a morpheme before a vowel, and in clusters"
ь:0 <=> _ %>: :Vow/:0* ;
        Cns:0 _ ; ! if softened consonant is also deleted
!        Cns: Cns: _ %>: ;
!FIXME: when in clusters?  Only before vowels, right? -JNW

!! FIXME: wat?  The rule is names "ь to и", but does ь:0 ...
!"ь to и before px3sp" 
!ь:0 <=> _ %>: %{z%}:  ; 

!@ о б л а с т:0 ь:0 >:0 {G}:к {A}:а

!@ л а г е р ь:0 >:0 {z}:0 {I}:и {n}:н >:0 {G}:г {A}:е 

!"р deletion in aorist"
!р:0 <=> _ [ %>: %{I%}: р ]  ;

"р deletion in aorist"
%{р%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{I%}: р: ;

!@ б а {р}:0 >:0 {I}:а р

!@ б е {р} >:0 {I}:и ң {A}:е р

"й deletion before yot vowels"
й:0 <=> _ %{A%}:/:0* ;
        _ %{y%}:ю/:0* ;
        :BackVow/:0* _ %{E%}:/:0* ;

!@ ч а й:0 >:0 {A}:я р
!@ к у й:0 {y}:ю c


"{л} deletion in certain forms"
%{л%}:0 <=> _ [ %{i%}: | %{I%}: ]/[ :0 - [ %{i%}: | %{I%}: ] ]* ;

!@ э к к е:э {л}:0 {i}:э п

"stem-final п deletes in {i}п forms"
п:0 <=> :Vow _ %>: %{i%}: п: ;

!@ ш а п:0 >:0 {i}:а п 



!!== Consonant cluster stuff ==!!

!"т deletion in -ст consonant cluster"
!т:0 <=> .#. [ Vow: | Cns: ]* с _ %>: :Cns ;

!! FIXME: This needs work, also applies to other possessives
!"consonant cluster reduction"
!с:0 <=> Vow _ с: (%{☭%}:) %>: :Vow/:0* ; 

!@ к л а с:0 с:з >:0 {z}:0 {I}:ы {n}:0

!@ б о к с >:0 {z}:0 {I}:у {n}:0

!@ к о н к у р с:0 {☭}:0 >:0 {z}:0 {I}:у {n}:0

!@ а р т и с т:0 >:0 {L}:т {A}:е р

!@ ч а ъ:0 с:з >:0 {i}:ы м

!@ ч а ъ:0 с:з >:0 {i}:ы м >:0 {G}:г {A}:а

"Delete {и} at end of word and between с and most morphemes"
%{и%}:0 <=> _ .#. ; 
            с: _ %>:0 \%{z%}: ;    ! always :0
            !с: _ %>:0 [ ? - %{z%}: ] ;
            !с: _ %>:0 [ %{N%}: | %{L%}: | %{D%}: | %{G%}: ] ;    ! always :0

!"some clusters reduce before {и}"
"delete с in some clusters"
с:0 <=> [ к | р ] _ %{и%}:RusHighVow ;      ! delete с in кс, рс
        _ с: (%{☭%}:) %>: :Vow/:0* ;        ! delete с in сс

"ст cluster reduction when following morpheme"
т:0 <=> с: _ (ь:) %{☭%}: %>: ;

!@ о б л а с:з т:0 ь:0 {☭}:0 >:0 {z}:0 {I}:ы {n}:0
!@ ү с т >:0 {z}:0 {I}:ү {n}:0


!@ ч е ч е к >:0 {L}:т {A}:е р >:0 {D}:д {A}:е н
!@ ө ө к:г >:0 {z}:0 {I}:ү {n}:0 
!@ ш а к:г >:0 {z}:0 {I}:ы {n}:0 
!@ о т >:0 {D}:т {A}:а н
!@ к и ж и >:0 {D}:д {A}:е н
!@ х ө й л е ң >:0 {D}:д {A}:е н
!@ х ө й л е ң >:0 {N}:н {I}:и ң

!@ а й т ы р ы г:0 >:0 {z}:0 {I}:ы {n}:0

!@ б а р >:0 -:- {D}:д {I}:ы р

!@ у г:0 >:0 {i}:у п

!@ э г:0 >:0 {i}:э п



!!== Old Rules ==!!

!"D nasal harmony"
!%{D%}:н <=> :Nasals/[ :0 - Abstract:0 ] _ :Vow :Nasals ;
!        except 
!            %{n%}: %>: _ ; 

!"Deletion of {z} after a consonant"
!%{z%}:0 <=> [ :Cns (:ь) | й:0 ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - й:0 ] ] _ ;

!"Desonorisation after non-epenthesised vowel"
!Cx:т <=> [ :VoicelessCns %{y%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{y%}: ]* _ ;
!     except
!         [ :Nasals %{y%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{y%}: ]* _ ;
!     where Cx in ( л н ) ;

!"Forward voicing assimilation of normal stuff"
!Cx:Cy <=> :VoicelessCns/:0* _ ;
!          where Cx in ( л н )
!                Cy in ( т т )
!                matched;

!"Devoicing of some cons before unrealised epenthetic vowel"
!Cx:Cy <=> _ %{y%}:0/[ :0 - %{y%}: ]* :VoicelessCns ;
!      where Cx in ( д з )
!            Cy in ( т с )
!      matched ;

!"yotted {I} harmony"
!%{I%}:ю <=> [ [ у: | о: ] й: ]/:0* _ ;

!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ Vx:0 Cns* ]/[ :%- | :0 - AbstractVow: ]* _ ;
!         where          Vx in ( %{э%} )

!"{A} stays а" ! FIXME
!%{A%}:а <=> :BackVow/[ :0 - й: ]* _ ;

!"Delete {N} after {n}"
!%{N%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: _ ;

!"г deletion in aorist"
!г:0 <=> _ %>: [ %{A%}: | %{I%}: ] р ; 
